Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 10 of this 2018 Act:
(1) “Affiliate” means a  person that directly or indirectly owns or controls, is owned or
controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with, another person.
(2) “Control,” for purposes of the definition of “affiliate”  under this section, means direct
or indirect possession of  the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and
policies of a person, whether through  the ownership of voting securities, by contract or
otherwise.
(3) “Heavy equipment rental tax” means the tax  imposed under section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(4) “Mobile” means that qualified heavy equipment:
(a) Is intended to be moved among worksites as needed; and
(b) Is not  intended to be permanently affixed to real property when put to its intended
use.
(5) “Own,” for purposes of  the definition of “affiliate” under this section, means to have
ownership of an equity interest, or the equivalent, of 10 percent or more in a person.
(6) “Qualified heavy equipment” means  any construction, mining, earthmoving or indus-
trial equipment, together with attachments and other equipment and  tools, including, but
not limited to, towable trailers and fixed load vehicles, that is:
(a) Mobile;
(b) Owned by a qualified heavy equipment provider; and
(c) Held primarily for rental.
(7)(a) “Qualified heavy equipment provider” means a person that is  primarily engaged in
the business of renting qualified heavy equipment without an operator.
(b) “Qualified heavy equipment provider” does not  mean a person primarily engaged in
the business of renting qualified heavy equipment to one or more of the person’s affiliates.
(8) “Rent,” “rental” and “renting” mean entering into an agreement for the  use of
property in exchange for consideration for a term  of less than 365 consecutive days, an
open-ended term or an undefined term.
(9) “Rental location” means  a qualified heavy equipment provider’s store or other busi-
ness location in this state from which qualified heavy equipment is rented.
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-A) Page 1
(10) “Rental price” means the rental charge  for qualified heavy equipment, net of any
invoice credits provided to the  renter. “Rental price” does not include delivery and pickup
fees, damage waivers or environmental mitigation fees.
SECTION 2. (1) A tax of two percent is imposed on the rental price received for any
qualified heavy equipment.
(2) The tax imposed under  this section shall be collected by the qualified heavy equipment
provider from the renter at the time that the rental of  the qualified heavy equipment is
made.
(3) Qualified heavy equipment is exempt  from any and all ad valorem property taxes if
rental of the qualified heavy equipment is subject to taxation under this section.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, the exemption granted under  subsection (3) of this
section does not have a maximum term.
SECTION 3. (1) Every qualified heavy equipment provider shall register with the De-
partment of Revenue in the form and  manner prescribed by the department no later than
December 15 immediately preceding the beginning of the next property tax  year by certifying
that the provider is engaged in the line of business described in section 1 (7) of  this 2018 Act.
(2) Every qualified heavy  equipment provider shall keep records, render statements and
comply with rules adopted by the department with respect  to the heavy equipment rental
tax. The records and statements required by this section must be sufficient to show  whether
there is a tax liability under section 2 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Every qualified heavy equipment provider that  rents out qualified heavy
equipment is responsible for collecting the heavy equipment rental tax and shall  file a return
with the Department of Revenue, on or  before the last day of the month following the end
of each calendar quarter, reporting the amount of tax due during the  quarter. The depart-
ment shall prescribe  the form and manner of the return required by this section, provided
that the form shall require the qualified heavy equipment  provider to report, for each county
in the state, the aggregate rental prices and taxes collected  for qualified heavy equipment
rented out from each of its rental locations in the county  during the applicable calendar
quarter. The rules of the department shall require that returns be made under penalties  for
false swearing.
(2) When  a return is required under subsection (1) of this section, the qualified heavy
equipment provider required to make the return shall remit the tax due  to the department
at the time fixed for filing the return.
SECTION 5. If the amount paid by a qualified  heavy equipment provider to the Depart-
ment of Revenue under section 4 of this 2018 Act exceeds the amount of tax payable,  the
department shall refund  the amount of the excess. A refund may not be made to a qualified
heavy equipment provider that fails to claim the refund within two years  after the due date
for filing the return to which the claim for refund relates.
SECTION 6. (1) Every qualified heavy equipment provider is  deemed to hold the amount
of heavy equipment rental  taxes collected in trust for the State of Oregon and for payment
to the Department of  Revenue in the manner and at the time provided under section 4 of this
2018 Act.
(2) At any time the qualified heavy equipment provider fails to remit any amount of
heavy equipment rental taxes deemed to be held in trust for the State of Oregon, the de-
partment may enforce collection by the issuance  of a distraint warrant for the collection of
the delinquent amount and all penalties, interest and  collection charges accrued on the de-
linquent amount. The warrant shall be issued, docketed and  proceeded upon in the same
manner and shall have the same force and effect as warrants for the collection of  delinquent
income taxes.
SECTION 7. (1) Unless  the context requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters
305, 314 and 316 governing the audit and examination of  reports and returns, confidentiality
of reports and returns, determination of deficiencies, assessments, claims  for refunds, pen-
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-A) Page 2
alties, interest, jeopardy  assessments, warrants, conferences and appeals to the Oregon Tax
Court, and related procedures, apply to sections  1 to 10 of this 2018 Act as if the heavy
equipment rental tax were a tax imposed upon or measured by net income. The provisions
apply to the taxpayer liable for the tax and to any qualified heavy equipment provider  re-
quired to collect the tax.
(2) Any amount collected and  required to be remitted to the Department of Revenue is
considered a tax upon the qualified heavy  equipment provider required to collect the tax and
the qualified heavy equipment provider is considered a taxpayer.
SECTION 8.
(1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue  pursuant to sections
1 to 10 of this 2018 Act, and any interest on the moneys, shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445.
(2)(a) After the payment of refunds:
(A) Moneys necessary to reimburse the department  for the actual costs incurred by the
department in administering the heavy equipment rental tax, not to exceed five percent of
heavy equipment rental tax collections, are continuously  appropriated to the department;
and
(B) An amount equal to two percent of the gross moneys received shall  be transferred
pro rata to counties that do not receive a transfer of moneys under  paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(b) After deduction for the amounts described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the
balance of the  moneys received shall be transferred to the treasurer of each county accord-
ing to the share  of the moneys that are attributable to qualified heavy equipment rented out
from rental locations in the county.
(3) Each county treasurer shall:
(a) Deposit the moneys received from the department under  subsection (2) of this section
in the unsegregated tax collections account described in ORS 311.385; and
(b) Distribute the moneys in accordance with ORS 311.390.
(4) Provisions of law relating  to the confidentiality of public records do not apply to the
extent that remittances made by the department pursuant to this section disclose informa-
tion derived from heavy equipment rental tax returns.
SECTION 9.
(1) Public records of heavy equipment rental tax  moneys collected by the
Department of Revenue pursuant to sections 1 to 10 of this 2018 Act are exempt  from dis-
closure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478. Nothing in this  section shall limit the use that can be
made of such information for  regulatory purposes or its use and admissibility in any
enforcement proceedings.
(2) If a conflict is found  to exist between subsection (1) of this section and ORS 314.835,
ORS 314.835 controls.
SECTION 10. The Department of Revenue  may adopt rules necessary for the adminis-
tration and enforcement of the heavy  equipment rental tax under sections 1 to 10 of this 2018
Act.
SECTION 11. (1) Sections 1  to 10 of this 2018 Act apply to rentals of qualified heavy
equipment occurring on or after January 1, 2019.
(2) For purposes of complying with section 3 (1) of this  2018 Act for the property tax year
beginning on July 1, 2018, a  qualified heavy equipment provider shall register with the De-
partment of Revenue no later than December 31, 2018.
SECTION 12. (1)(a) On or before March 31, 2019, each qualified heavy equipment provider
shall file with the Department of Revenue a complete report on forms  provided by the de-
partment, made under penalties for false swearing, that lists the qualified heavy equipment
that is assigned to each rental location and that is:
(A) In this state on January 1, 2019, at 1:00 a.m.; and
(B) Subject to the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this 2018 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-A) Page 3
(b) The report required under this subsection shall provide the  cost, acquisition date,
description and rental location of each piece of qualified heavy equipment.
(c) The department shall use the  report required under this subsection and the 14 years
personal property valuation factors found in Table 2 of the department’s  Personal Property
Valuation Guidelines 2017, as revised effective December 2016, to determine a real market
value for the qualified heavy equipment for purposes of this section.
(d) For purposes of this section,  the department shall determine the maximum assessed
value and assessed  value for the qualified heavy equipment under ORS 308.153, treating the
qualified heavy equipment as new property within the meaning of ORS 308.149 (6)(a)(C).
(e) The department shall use the values determined  under this section to estimate the
amount of ad valorem property  taxes that would be due for the property tax year beginning
on July 1, 2019, if the qualified heavy equipment  were subject to ad valorem property taxa-
tion.
(2) On or before March 31, 2020, for each rental location, the department shall compare:
(a) The total amount of tax reported  under section 4 of this 2018 Act, after any adjust-
ment or amended returns, that is attributable to qualified heavy equipment rented out  from
the rental location during the 2019 calendar year; and
(b) The total estimated ad  valorem property tax amount determined under subsection (1)
of this section.
(3)(a) If the total amount determined  under subsection (2)(a) of this section is less than
the total amount determined under subsection (2)(b) of  this section, the department shall
collect the amount of the difference from the applicable qualified heavy equipment provider
as a supplemental  amount of the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this
2018 Act.
(b) The supplemental tax amount shall  be payable on or before the later of June 30, 2020,
or within 60 days after the date of the notice from the department.
(c) After retaining moneys necessary to reimburse the department for  the actual costs
incurred by the department in administering this section, not  to exceed five percent of the
supplemental tax amount, the department shall remit each net supplemental  tax amount
collected under this subsection to the treasurer of the county in which the applicable  rental
location is located and the  county treasurer shall deposit all such amounts in the county’s
unsegregated tax collections account.
(4) If the amount  determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section is greater than the
amount determined under subsection (2)(b) of this section,  the department shall, in the
department’s sole discretion, refund the amount of the difference to the  qualified heavy
equipment provider without interest or issue the amount  of the difference without interest
as a  credit against future heavy equipment rental tax liabilities of the qualified heavy
equipment provider.
(5) Provisions of law relating  to the confidentiality of public records do not apply to the
extent that remittances and refunds made by the department pursuant to this section dis-
close information derived from heavy equipment rental tax returns.
SECTION 13.
(1)(a) On or before March 31, 2020, each qualified heavy equipment provider
shall file with the Department of Revenue a complete report on forms  provided by the de-
partment, made under penalties for false swearing, that lists the qualified heavy equipment
that is assigned to each rental location and that is:
(A) In this state on January 1, 2020, at 1:00 a.m.; and
(B) Subject to the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(b) The report required under this subsection shall provide the  cost, acquisition date,
description and rental location of each piece of qualified heavy equipment.
(c) The department shall use the  report required under this subsection and the 14 years
personal property valuation factors found in Table 2 of the department’s  Personal Property
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-A) Page 4
Valuation Guidelines 2017, as revised effective December 2016, to determine a real market
value for the qualified heavy equipment for purposes of this section.
(d) For purposes of this section, the department  shall determine the maximum assessed
value and assessed value for the qualified heavy equipment under ORS 308.153,  treating the
qualified heavy equipment as new property within the meaning of ORS 308.149 (6)(a)(C).
(e) The department shall use the values  determined under this section to estimate the
amount of ad valorem property taxes that would be due for the  property tax year beginning
on July 1, 2020, if the qualified heavy  equipment were subject to ad valorem property taxa-
tion.
(2) On or before March 31, 2021, for each rental location, the department shall compare:
(a) The total amount of tax reported under section 4 of  this 2018 Act, after any adjust-
ment or amended returns, that is attributable to qualified heavy equipment rented out  from
the rental location during the 2020 calendar year; and
(b) The total estimated ad  valorem property tax amount determined under subsection (1)
of this section.
(3)(a) If the total amount determined under subsection (2)(a) of  this section is less than
the total amount determined under subsection  (2)(b) of this section, the department shall
collect the amount of the difference from the applicable qualified heavy equipment provider
as a supplemental  amount of the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this
2018 Act.
(b) The supplemental tax amount shall  be payable on or before the later of June 30, 2021,
or within 60 days after the date of the notice from the department.
(c) After retaining moneys  necessary to reimburse the department for the actual costs
incurred by the department in administering this  section, not to exceed five percent of the
supplemental tax amount,  the department shall remit each net supplemental tax amount
collected under this subsection to the treasurer of the county in which the applicable  rental
location is located and the county treasurer shall deposit all such  amounts in the county’s
unsegregated tax collections account.
(4) If the amount determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section is  greater than the
amount determined under subsection (2)(b) of  this section, the department shall, in the
department’s sole discretion,  refund the amount of the difference to the qualified heavy
equipment provider without interest or issue  the amount of the difference without interest
as a credit against future heavy equipment rental tax liabilities of the qualified  heavy
equipment provider.
(5) Provisions of law relating to the confidentiality of public records do  not apply to the
extent that remittances and refunds made by the department pursuant to this section dis-
close information derived from heavy equipment rental tax returns.
SECTION 14.
Sections 7, 9 and 10 of this  2018 Act and the definitions provided by section
1 of this 2018 Act apply to sections 12 and 13 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 15. Sections 12 and 13 of this 2018 Act are repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 16. (1) Not later than July 1, 2022,  the Department of Revenue, after consulting
with the  Legislative Revenue Officer as necessary, shall submit a report in the manner pro-
vided in ORS  192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to re-
venue regarding the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(2) For tax years with valuation dates  of January 1, 2019, and January 1, 2020, the report
shall set forth:
(a) The revenue collected under sections 12 (3)(a) and 13 (3)(a) of this 2018 Act, after
payment of refunds, for all taxpayers registered as qualified heavy equipment  providers; and
(b) The amount of ad valorem property taxes that would have been due  for the property
tax years beginning  on July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020, respectively, if the qualified heavy
equipment had been subject to ad valorem property taxation.
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-A) Page 5
(3) In the report the Legislative Revenue Officer shall propose a  tax rate for section 2
of this  2018 Act that, based on the experience of the heavy equipment rental tax to date, will
maintain revenue neutrality with respect to the replacement of the ad valorem  property tax
by the heavy equipment rental tax.
SECTION 17. Section 16 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 18. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-A) Page 6